Maryland, session 2025, HB0741.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(k) [(1)] “Hunt” means to pursue, capture, catch, kill, gig, trap, shoot, or attempt
to pursue, capture, catch, kill, gig, trap, or shoot, or in any manner reduce any bird or
mammal to personal possession.
[(2) “Hunt” excludes the sport of fox chasing.]
10–214.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE DEER MANAGEMENT
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS A DEER MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO EDUCATE AND ASSIST FARMERS
WITH DEER MANAGEMENT AND HUNTING ON PRIVATE LAND.
(D) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT OF BUDGET AND
MANAGEMENT SHALL INCREASE THE NUMBER OF FULL–TIME EMPLOYEES IN THE
DEPARTMENT BY ONE PERMANENT, CLASSIFIED POSITION TO ADMINISTER THE
PROGRAM.
10–408.
(a) (1) In this section[, “handgun”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANING INDICATED.
(2) “HANDGUN” means a firearm:
[(1)] (I) With a barrel length not exceeding 6 inches; and
[(2)] (II) That does not have a scope or an electronic device attached.
(3) “NONLEAD AMMUNITION” INCLUDES:

HOUSE BILL 741 3
(I) AMMUNITION IN WHICH THERE IS LESS THAN 1% LEAD
CONTENT; AND
(II) ANY FEDERALLY APPROVED NONTOXIC AMMUNITION.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Department
shall:
(i) Prescribe by regulation the means or weapons for hunting
designated wildlife; and
(ii) Set forth any restrictions relating to weapons used to hunt
designated wildlife, including the amount [and], size, AND TYPE of ammunition for
designated game birds or mammals.
(2) The Department may not prohibit a licensed bow hunter from openly
carrying a handgun that the hunter is otherwise authorized to carry under § 4–203 of the
Criminal Law Article if the bow hunter:
(i) Is at least 21 years old;
(ii) Is hunting in deer management Region A as defined by the
Department’s Guide to Hunting and Trapping;
(iii) Is carrying the handgun for personal protection; and
(iv) Does not use the handgun to kill wildlife wounded by a vertical
bow or crossbow.
(c) The Department shall make the regulations available for distribution with
each hunting license purchased.
(d) This section does not authorize the Department to restrict the use of firearms
except in the activity of hunting designated wildlife.
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2029, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE
THE USE OF NONLEAD AMMUNITION FOR THE HUNTING OF ALL GAME SPECIES.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBSECTION.
10–410.
(Q) ANY PERSON WHO PARTICIPATES IN UNARMED FOX CHASING:

HOUSE BILL 741
(1) IS EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 10–301.1(A)(1) OF
THIS TITLE; AND
(2) SHALL POSSESS A RESIDENT OR NONRESIDENT FULL SEASON
HUNTING LICENSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before July 1, 2026, the Department of Natural Resources shall adopt
regulations requiring the use of nonlead ammunition for hunting pen–raised birds on
regulated shooting areas.
(b) On or before July 1, 2027, the Department of Natural Resources shall adopt
regulations requiring the use of nonlead ammunition for hunting upland game birds.
(c) On or before July 1, 2028, the Department of Natural Resources shall adopt
regulations requiring nonlead ammunition for hunting webless migratory game bird
species and wild turkey.
(d) On or before July 1, 2029, the Department of Natural Resources shall adopt
regulations requiring the use of nonlead ammunition for muzzleloaders, rifles, and
shotguns used for hunting deer and any other game species not specified in subsections (a)
through (c) of this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.